Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 2

Rulemaking and Publications

4-5-201. Petitions for or against rules.

Except where the right to petition for a rule is restricted by statute to a designated group or except where the form of procedure for such petition is otherwise prescribed by statute, any municipality, corporation or any five (5) or more persons having an interest in a rule may petition an agency requesting the adoption, amendment or repeal of such rule.

Such petition shall state clearly and concisely:

The substance or nature of the rulemaking that is requested;

The reasons for the request and the petitioner's interest in the request; and

Reference to the authority of the agency to take the action that is requested.

After submission of a petition, the agency shall, as promptly as is consistent with the orderly dispatch of its business, deny the request or grant the same or provide for some modified form of the proposed rule. If the agency denies the petition, it shall promptly give notice thereof to the person who filed the petition. If the agency grants the petition in whole or in part, it shall proceed to meet the rulemaking requirements set out in this chapter.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 5; 1975, ch. 370, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 4-511, 4-5-105; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 9.

Cross-References. Public hearing on endangered species list, §70-8-305.

Law Reviews.

Nonacquiescence: Outlaw Agencies, Imperial Courts, and the Perils of Pluralism (Deborah Maranville), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 471 (1986).

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-202. When hearings required.

An agency shall precede all its rulemaking with notice and a public hearing unless:

The rule is adopted as an emergency rule; or

The proposed rule is posted to the administrative register website within the secretary of state's website within seven (7) days of receipt, together with a statement that the agency will adopt the proposed rule without a public hearing unless within ninety (90) days after filing of the proposed rule with the secretary of state, a petition for a public hearing on the proposed rule is filed by ten (10) persons who will be affected by the rule, an association of ten (10) or more members, a municipality or by a majority vote of any standing committee of the general assembly. If an agency receives such a petition, it shall not proceed with the proposed rulemaking until it has given notice and held a hearing as provided in this section. The agency shall forward the petition to the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall not be required to compile all filings of the preceding month into one (1) document.

Subdivision (a)(2) does not apply if another statute specifically requires the agency to hold a hearing prior to adoption of the rule under consideration.

The secretary of state shall prescribe rules governing the manner and form in which proposed written rules shall be prepared by the agencies for submission for publication under subdivision (a)(2). The secretary of state may require the online submission of rules and related filings pursuant to this part. The secretary of state may refuse to accept for publication any proposed rule that does not conform to such requirements.

Acts 1975, ch. 370, § 8; 1978, ch. 938, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-530; Acts 1980, ch. 729, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-124; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 10; 2009, ch. 566, § 5; 2014, ch. 782, § 1; 2015, ch. 502, § 1; 2016, ch. 576, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Law Reviews.

State Rulemaking Under the Administrative Procedures Act — Legal Remedies (William N. Bates), 16 Tenn. B.J. No. 2, 21 (1980).

Attorney General Opinions. The pharmacy based immunization program guidelines adopted by the Tennessee board of pharmacy are void as they were not promulgated as rules under the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, OAG 01-091, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/4/01).

4-5-203. Notice of hearing.

Whenever an agency is required by law to hold a public hearing as part of its rulemaking process, the agency shall:

Transmit written notice of the hearings to the secretary of state for publication in the notice section of the administrative register website and, if a statute applicable to the specific agency or a specific rule or class of rules under consideration requires some other form of publication, publish notice as required by that statute in addition to publication in the notice section of the administrative register website. Such notice of a hearing shall remain on the website until the date of such hearing;

Whenever an agency is required by law to hold a public hearing as part of its rulemaking process, the agency shall make copies of the rule available in redline form to persons in attendance at the hearing. As used in this subsection (a), “redline form” has the same meaning as defined in § 4-5-226(i)(2)(B);

Take such other steps as it deems necessary to convey effective notice to persons who are likely to have an interest in the proposed rulemaking.

Except as otherwise permitted by § 4-5-204(e), notice through publication on the administrative register website shall be given at least forty-five (45) days prior to the date set for the hearing and shall be deemed to have been given seven (7) days from the date notice was transmitted to the secretary of state for such publication.

The notice required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) shall include:

A statement of the time and place at which the hearing is to be held;

The express terms of the rule being proposed; provided, that an informative summary reasonably calculated to give notice to interested parties may be substituted for the express terms of the proposed rule if:

The express terms of the rule being proposed are filed with the secretary of state;

The secretary of state determines that publication of the entire text of the proposed rule would be impractical; and

The complete text of the express terms of the proposed rule is made available by the secretary of state or the agency for public inspection and copying;

Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude an agency from making changes in the rule being proposed after the public hearing, so long as the changes are within the scope of the rulemaking notice filed with the secretary of state;

Insofar as practicable, a reference to the statutory authority pursuant to which the agency proposed to adopt the rule; and

Any additional matter that may be prescribed by statute applicable to the specific rule or class of rules under consideration.

Failure of any person to receive notice of a hearing on proposed rulemaking is not grounds for invalidating the resulting rule if notice of the hearing was published as provided in subdivision (a)(1).

The secretary of state shall prescribe rules governing the manner and form in which written notice of hearings shall be transmitted by the agencies to the secretary of state for publication in the notice section of the administrative register website. The secretary of state may require the online submission of notices of hearing and related filings pursuant to this part. The secretary of state may refuse to accept for publication any notice of hearing transmitted that does not conform to such requirements, in which case transmission of notice shall be deemed not to have been satisfied under subdivision (a)(1) and subsection (b).

Except as provided in subdivision (f)(2), a hearing shall be conducted prior to the adoption of a permanent rule if such rule was filed previously as an emergency rule pursuant to § 4-5-208.

A hearing shall not be required if the emergency rule was required by an agency of the federal government and adoption of the rule through ordinary rulemaking procedures might jeopardize the loss of a federal program or funds.

Acts 1975, ch. 370, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 4-531, 4-5-125; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 11; 1986, ch. 738, § 6; 1991, ch. 346, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 566, §§ 6, 7; 2010, ch. 1125, § 1; 2014, ch. 782, § 2; 2016, ch. 576, § 2; 2018, ch. 611, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 1125, § 2 provided that the act, which added subsection (f), shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2010.

Law Reviews.

State Rulemaking Under the Administrative Procedures Act — Legal Remedies (William N. Bates), 16 Tenn. B.J. No. 2, 21 (1980).

Embracing Our Public Purpose: A Value-Based Lawyer-Licensing Model, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 351 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. The pharmacy based immunization program guidelines adopted by the Tennessee board of pharmacy are void as they were not promulgated as rules under the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, OAG 01-091, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/4/01).

4-5-204. Conduct of hearings.

The agency shall hold a public hearing at the time and place designated in the notice of hearing, and shall afford all interested persons or their representatives an opportunity to present facts, views or arguments relative to the proposal under consideration.

The presiding officer may limit oral presentations if the presiding officer feels that the length of the hearing otherwise would be unduly increased by reason of repetition.

The agency shall afford each interested person opportunity to present facts, views or arguments in writing, whether or not such person had an opportunity to present them orally.

At the beginning of each hearing, if the agency has made a proposal, the agency shall present a summary of the factual information on which its proposal is based, including any information obtained through the use of advisory committees or as a result of informal conferences or consultation.

The person authorized by the agency to conduct the hearing may administer oaths or affirmations and may continue or postpone the hearing to such time and place as it determines.

The agency shall keep minutes or a record of the hearing in such manner as it determines to be desirable and feasible.

If the officer or a quorum of the board or commission charged by law with ultimate responsibility for rulemaking is not present at the hearing, a person who appears at the hearing shall be given an opportunity to present the person's arguments to such officer or quorum of such board or commission prior to adoption of the proposed rule if, at the hearing, the person makes a request for such opportunity in writing to the person presiding at the hearing.

Such officer, board or commission may in its discretion require such arguments to be presented in writing.

If a record of the hearing has been made, argument shall be limited to the record.

Where oral argument is accorded, such officer, board or commission may impose reasonable limitations on the length and number of appearances in order to conserve time and preclude undue repetition.

The procedures prescribed by this section are supplemental to procedures prescribed by any statute relating to the specific agency or to the rule or class of rules under consideration. However, in any case of conflict between this section and another procedural administrative statute, this section shall control.

Prior to holding the public hearing as required by subsection (a), the agency may solicit comments from the public on a subject matter of possible rulemaking under active consideration within the agency, significant aspects of which remain undeveloped, by causing notice of the hearing to be published in accordance with the requirements of § 4-5-203. At such hearing notice of the time and place of the public hearing required by subsection (a) shall be announced; and the agency shall take other appropriate actions to comply with § 4-5-203 and title 8, chapter 44, part 1. The hearing procedures set forth in this subsection (e) are in addition to, and not a substitution for, the requirements of § 4-5-203. When the agency has determined the specifics of the proposal, it must comply with the normal hearing and notice requirement of rulemaking.

Acts 1975, ch. 370, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 4-532, 4-5-126; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 12; 1986, ch. 738, § 6; 1991, ch. 346, § 3.

Law Reviews.

Embracing Our Public Purpose: A Value-Based Lawyer-Licensing Model, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 351 (2017).

4-5-205. Consideration of arguments — Reasons given for agency action — Advisory committees.

The agency shall consider fully all written and oral submissions respecting proposed rules.

Upon adoption of a rule, the agency, if requested to do so by an interested person prior to adoption or within thirty (30) days thereafter, shall issue a concise statement of the principal reasons for its action.

An agency is authorized to appoint committees of experts or interested persons or representatives of the general public to advise it with respect to any contemplated rulemaking. The powers of such committees shall be advisory only. The agency may at its election compensate the members of such advisory committees for their services.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 3; 1975, ch. 370, § 7; 1978, ch. 712, § 1; 1978, ch. 938, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 4-509, 4-5-103(c); Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 13.

4-5-206. Filing of rules.

It is the duty of the secretary of state to file the rules of each agency in a convenient and accessible manner. Each copy of a rule filed shall contain a citation of the authority pursuant to which it was adopted, and if an amendment, it shall clearly identify the original rule by rule number and title.

The secretary of state shall endorse on each copy of a rule or rules filed the time and date of filing and shall maintain a file of such rules for public inspection.

No rule shall be filed under this chapter unless it complies with § 4-5-211.

The secretary of state shall prescribe rules governing the manner and form in which written rules shall be prepared and transmitted by the agencies to the secretary of state for filing. The secretary of state may require the online submission of rules filed pursuant to this part. The secretary of state may refuse to accept any rule that does not conform to such requirements.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 4; 1975, ch. 370, § 10; 1978, ch. 895, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; Acts 1978, ch. 938, § 2; 1979, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 200, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 4-510; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 550, § 1; 1980, ch. 758, § 1; 1981, ch. 42, §§ 1, 3; 1981, ch. 47, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 49, § 1; 1981, ch. 140, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-104(e)(2), (e)(3), (f); Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 14; 2009, ch. 566, §§ 8, 9; 2016, ch. 576, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

4-5-207. Effective dates of rules.

No rule shall become effective unless it complies with §§4-5-206 and4-5-211. No rule, unless filed as an emergency rule pursuant §4-5-208, shall become effective until ninety (90) days after the filing of such rule in the office of the secretary of state.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 16; 1986, ch. 738, § 8; 1993, ch. 316, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

4-5-208. Emergency rules.

An agency may, upon stating its reasons in writing for making such findings, proceed without prior notice or hearing to adopt an emergency rule, if the agency finds that:

An immediate danger to the public health, safety or welfare exists, and the nature of this danger is such that the use of any other form of rulemaking authorized by this chapter would not adequately protect the public;

The rule only delays the effective date of another rule that is not yet effective;

It is required by the constitution or court order;

It is required by an agency of the federal government and adoption of the rule through ordinary rulemaking procedures described in this chapter might jeopardize the loss of a federal program or funds; or

The agency is required by an enactment of the general assembly to implement rules within a prescribed period of time that precludes utilization of rulemaking procedures described elsewhere in this chapter for the promulgation of permanent rules.

The emergency rule shall become effective immediately, unless otherwise stated in the rule, upon a copy of the rule and a copy of the written statement of the reasons for the rule being filed with the secretary of state. The emergency rule may be effective for a period of not longer than one hundred eighty (180) days. An agency shall not adopt the same or a substantially similar emergency rule within one (1) calendar year from its first adoption, unless the agency clearly establishes that it could not reasonably be foreseen during the initial one hundred eighty-day period that the emergency would continue or would likely recur during the next nine (9) months. The adoption of the same or substantially similar rule through ordinary rulemaking procedures authorized by this chapter shall not be precluded by this section.

The agency shall take steps to make emergency rules known to persons who will be affected by the rules. The secretary of state shall post the emergency rule filing to the administrative register website within four (4) days of filing. An emergency rule filing shall remain on the administrative register website until the filing expires. The secretary of state shall update relevant rules to reflect the filing and the expiration of emergency rules.

In any action contesting a rule adopted in reliance upon this section, the burden of persuasion shall be upon the agency to demonstrate that the rule meets the criteria established by this section.

An agency's finding of an emergency pursuant to this section shall not be based upon the agency's failure to timely process and file rules through the normal rulemaking process.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 17; 1991, ch. 346, § 4; 1993, ch. 316, §§ 4, 5; 2009, ch. 566, § 11; 2014, ch. 782, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

4-5-209. Reference to public necessity rules deemed references to emergency rules.

Any reference in this code to public necessity rules shall be deemed to be a reference to emergency rules as provided in §4-5-208. The Tennessee code commission is directed to change all references to public necessity rules, wherever such references appear in this code, to emergency rules, as sections are amended and volumes are replaced.

Acts 1981, ch. 47, § 3; T.C.A., §4-5-133; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 18; 1986, ch. 738, § 7; 1993, ch. 316, § 6; 2009, ch. 566, § 12; 2015, ch. 502, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

4-5-210. Promulgation of rules relating to guides to practice.

All entities listed in chapter 29, part 2 of this title that establish or adopt guides to practice or that regulate professions that establish or adopt guides to practice shall promulgate rules specifying all provisions included in and relating to the guides to practice.

No entity subject to this section shall adopt guides to practice developed or approved by any private organization or association that are not adopted in accordance with this chapter. Any changes to guides to practice made by a private organization or association after the guides to practice are adopted shall be effective only after the changes are also adopted in accordance with this chapter.

This subsection (a) only applies to guides to practice:

Established, adopted, or amended after April 28, 2017; and

That must be complied with in order to maintain a person's license, certification, or registration in order to practice a profession.

The rules promulgated by entities pursuant to subsection (a) shall:

Supersede any existing guides to practice developed or approved by a private organization or association that conflict with or are otherwise not included in such rules; and

Be promulgated in accordance with this chapter.

As used in this section, “guides to practice” includes codes of ethics and other measures that establish service quality standards. “Guides to practice” does not include:

Tests or examinations;

Building codes;

Safety codes; or

Drug standards.

Acts 2017, ch. 215, § 1.

4-5-211. Approval of rules by attorney general and reporter.

No rule shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state until such rule has been filed with the office of the attorney general and reporter. The office of the attorney general and reporter shall review the legality and constitutionality of every rule filed pursuant to this section and shall approve or disapprove of rules based upon the attorney general's determination of the legality of such rules. The attorney general and reporter shall not disapprove an emergency rule filed pursuant to §4-5-208 solely on the basis of failure to meet the statutory criteria for adoption of the rule contained in this chapter, unless the attorney general and reporter determines and states in writing that the attorney general and reporter could not defend the legality of the rule on the basis of failure to meet the statutory criteria for adoption of the rule contained in this chapter, in any action contesting the legal validity of the rule.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 20; 2009, ch. 566, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

4-5-212. Remand of rule that may constitute potentially unreasonable restraint of trade.

Prior to a rule being filed by a regulatory board, as defined in §4-4-126(a), with the secretary of state pursuant to §4-5-207 or §4-5-208, the commissioner or chief executive officer of the administrative department under which a regulatory board operates or to which a regulatory board is administratively attached, or a designee to the extent a conflict of interest may exist with respect to the commissioner or chief executive officer, will remand a rule that may constitute a potentially unreasonable restraint of trade to the regulatory board for additional information, further proceedings, or modification, if the rule is not consistent with a clearly articulated state policy or law established by the general assembly with respect to the regulatory board.

Acts 2017, ch. 230, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act relative to the doctrine of state antitrust immunity and the decision of the U.S. Supreme Court in North Carolina State Board of Dental Examiners v. Federal Trade Commission , 135 S. Ct. 1101 (2015), please refer to Acts 2017, ch. 230.

4-5-213. [Reserved.]

A rule may be withdrawn by the agency proposing the rule at any point prior to the effective date of the rule. The withdrawal shall become effective upon delivery of a written notification of such withdrawal to the office of the secretary of state and shall result in the nullification of all procedures undertaken or performed in order to promulgate the rule. The secretary of state may require the online submission of the notification of withdrawal of rules filed pursuant to this part.

If, pursuant to this chapter, an agency withdraws a rule amending a previously existing rule, then such previously existing rule shall continue in effect until it is later amended, repealed or superseded by law.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 4; 1975, ch. 370, § 10; 1978, ch. 895, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; Acts 1978, ch. 938, § 2; 1979, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 200, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 4-510; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 550, § 1; 1980, ch. 758, § 1; 1981, ch. 42, §§ 1, 3; 1981, ch. 47, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 49, § 1; 1981, ch. 140, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-104(i); Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 23; 2009, ch. 566, § 21; 2016, ch. 576, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

Attorney General Opinions. Publication of Rule Following Court's Invalidation of Rule Amendments. OAG 11-78, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (11/15/11).

4-5-215. Stay of effective date of rules.

Prior to the effective date of the rule, the agency proposing the rule may stay the running of the ninety-day period required by § 4-5-207 for a period of time not to exceed seventy-five (75) days. The stay shall become effective at such time as the agency files written notice with the secretary of state and shall specify the length of the effectiveness of the stay. The secretary of state may require the online submission of the notice of stay or related filings filed pursuant to this part. Prior to the expiration of the stay, the stay may be withdrawn by the agency. Withdrawal or expiration of the stay shall reactivate the running of the balance of the ninety-day period that remained upon the date the stay was filed.

Prior to the effective date of a rule, the house of representatives or senate government operations committee may stay the running of the ninety-day period required by § 4-5-207 for a period of time not to exceed seventy-five (75) days. Such stay shall become effective at such time as the committee files written notice with the secretary of state and shall specify the length of effectiveness of the stay. Prior to the expiration date of the stay, such stay may be withdrawn by the committee. Withdrawal or expiration of the stay shall reactivate the running of the balance of the ninety-day period that remained upon the date the stay was filed.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 4; 1975, ch. 370, § 10; 1978, ch. 895, §§ 1, 2; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 22, 36; Acts 1978, ch. 938, § 2; 1979, ch. 43, §§ 1, 2; 1979, ch. 200, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 4-510; modified; Acts 1980, ch. 550, § 1; 1980, ch. 758, § 1; 1981, ch. 42, §§ 1, 3; 1981, ch. 47, §§ 1, 4, 5; 1981, ch. 49, § 1; 1981, ch. 140, § 1; T.C.A., §4-5-104(j); Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 24; 1991, ch. 266, § 1; 1993, ch. 316, § 2; 1995, ch. 546, § 2; 2009, ch. 566, § 14; 2015, ch. 502, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 576, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

4-5-216. Invalidity of improperly adopted rules.

Any agency rule not adopted in compliance with this chapter shall be void and of no effect and shall not be effective against any person or party nor shall it be invoked by the agency for any purpose.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 25.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

Embracing Our Public Purpose: A Value-Based Lawyer-Licensing Model, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 351 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. The pharmacy based immunization program guidelines adopted by the Tennessee board of pharmacy are void as they were not promulgated as rules under the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, OAG 01-091, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 82 (6/4/01).

4-5-217. Rules of practice required.

In addition to other rulemaking requirements imposed by law, each agency shall adopt rules of practice setting forth the nature and requirements of all formal and informal procedures available, including, where practical, a description of all forms and instructions used by the agency.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 27.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

4-5-218. Public inspection and copying of agency rules, final orders and decisions.

Each agency shall make available for inspection and copying:

Agency rules, final orders and decisions;

Written statements of policy or interpretations formulated, adopted or used by the agency in the discharge of its functions;

Opinions of the attorney general and reporter rendered to the agency; and

A description of its current organization stating the general course and method of its operation and the methods whereby the public may obtain information or make submissions or requests.

The agency may charge reasonable compensatory fees for providing any documents specified in this section to requesting persons.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit access to public documents under any other provision of law.

The segregable portion of any document or other agency record specified in this section shall be provided to any person requesting such document or record after deletion of the portions that are confidential under any provision of law and payment of reasonable compensatory fees to the agency.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 28; 1986, ch. 738, § 10; 1994, ch. 903, § 1; 2009, ch. 566, § 22.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Records open to public inspection, exceptions, §10-7-503.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

4-5-219. Model rules of procedure.

The secretary of state, from time to time, may adopt, in accordance with the rulemaking requirements of this chapter, model rules of procedure appropriate for use by as many agencies as possible.

The model rules shall deal with all general functions and duties performed in common by several agencies.

Each agency shall adopt as much of the model rules as is practicable. To the extent an agency adopts the model rules, it shall do so in accordance with the rulemaking requirements of this chapter.

Any rule or procedure adopted by an agency that differs from the model rules shall be accompanied by a finding stating the reasons why the relevant portions of the model rules were impracticable for such agency.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 29; 2016, ch. 576, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

4-5-220. Publication of rules on the secretary of state's website — Contents of website.

After a rule is filed, the secretary of state shall, within seven (7) days of its acceptance, add the filed rule to the appropriate location within the portion of the secretary of state's website devoted to this chapter. The secretary of state's website shall contain the following:

The text of all pending rules, notices of rulemaking hearings, withdrawal of rules, stays of effective dates, withdrawal of stays of effective dates, emergency rules, announcements and proclamations. The text shall remain on the website until the filing becomes effective as provided by this chapter. After the effective date of the rule, the filing shall be archived on the website;

A table listing the citations of all rules filed that have pending effective dates, hearing dates or some other action required by this chapter;

A table listing all emergency rules in effect;

A table of all pending rules and regulations with projected financial impact upon local governments as provided to the secretary of state pursuant to § 4-5-228; and

Any other notices or documents designated by law or by the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall compile on the secretary of state's website an official compilation of all the effective rules of each agency. Rules compiled and published on the secretary of state's website as of July 1, 2016, shall be deemed the official compilation of the effective rules of each agency, as amended by the secretary of state from time to time to reflect the addition, deletion, or revision of rules in accordance with this part. The secretary of state shall update agency rules on the effective date of any new amendment to existing rules or of any new rules. The secretary of state shall incorporate emergency rules within the appropriate agency's rules within four (4) days of their filing. The secretary of state shall revise the official compilation of rules upon the expiration of an emergency rule.

The secretary of state may, in the secretary of state's discretion, omit from the register or the compilation rules, which, if published, would be unduly cumbersome, expensive or otherwise inexpedient, if such rules are made available in printed, electronic or processed form on application to the adopting agency, and if the register or compilation contains a notice stating the general subject matter of the rules so omitted and stating how copies of the rules may be obtained.

The secretary of state shall make the register website and the official rules and regulation website available through the internet without charge to the user.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 30; 1996, ch. 779, §§ 1, 2, 4; 2009, ch. 566, § 15; 2010, ch. 1070, § 1; 2014, ch. 782, §§ 4, 5; 2016, ch. 576, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

For the Preamble to the act regarding no law increasing expenditure requirements of cities or counties without state cost sharing, please refer to Acts 2010, ch. 1070.

Law Reviews.

Adding It Up: Implications of Tennessee's New High School Transition Policy and Graduation Requirements for Students with Disabilities (Kenlyn Foster-Spence), 76 Tenn. L. Rev. 447 (2009).

Embracing Our Public Purpose: A Value-Based Lawyer-Licensing Model, 48 U. Mem. L. Rev. 351 (2017).

Attorney General Opinions. Publication of Rule Following Court's Invalidation of Rule Amendments. OAG 11-78, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 79 (11/15/11).

4-5-221. Powers of secretary of state regarding publication — Certification of rules — Website and its contents prima facie evidence of regulatory law — Delegation of duties and powers.

With respect to the publication of the administrative code to be cited as the rules and regulations of the state of Tennessee, and with regard to the publication of the monthly administrative register to be cited as the Tennessee administrative register, the secretary of state shall have the powers set out in subdivision (a)(1); provided, that the requirements of subdivision (a)(2) are met:

In preparing the administrative code and administrative register the secretary of state shall not alter the sense, meaning or effect of any rule promulgated by an agency, but shall copy the exact language of the text of a rule filed with the secretary of state's office, except that the secretary of state is authorized to rearrange, regroup, and renumber the divisions, chapters, rules, and parts of rules for publication in the administrative code and monthly register and to change reference numbers to agree with any renumbered chapter or rule, to change the wording of and prepare new rule headings and symbols; to substitute the proper rule or chapter reference where the terms “these rules” or “this regulation” or similar expressions are used in the rules; to correct manifest misspelling and typographical errors and to change capitalization and spelling for the purpose of uniformity; to change references to governmental agencies, when part or all of the powers, rights or duties of such agencies have, by act of the general assembly or of the governor, been transferred to other agencies; and to omit preambles, captions and statements declaring authority and rulemaking intent. Where the application or effect of a rule, by its terms, depends on the time when the rule took effect, the secretary of state may substitute the actual effective date for the various forms of expression that mean that date, such as “when this rule (or chapter) takes effect” or “after (or before) the effective date of this rule (or chapter).” No such change shall be deemed an alteration or departure from the rule as filed.

Every agency filing rules for publication in the administrative code and administrative register shall assure the accuracy of its submission and that the submission meets the requirements of the rules and regulations promulgated by the secretary of state pursuant to this chapter, when they are filed with the secretary of state.

The secretary of state shall prepare a written certificate of approval for each website that certifies approval of the website and its contents and that the text of each rule was compared with the original filing with the secretary of state, and that, with the exception of changes in form permitted by subsection (a), the rules are accurately and correctly copied.

The website of the administrative register and administrative code and its contents that contain the secretary of state's certificate of approval shall constitute prima facie evidence of the regulatory law of the state of Tennessee and be received, recognized, referred to and used in all courts, agencies, departments, offices of and proceedings in Tennessee as the official compilation of rules and regulations of Tennessee.

The secretary of state is authorized to delegate any or all duties and powers set out in this section and chapter to the director of the publications division or any other members of the secretary of state's staff.

Acts 1975, ch. 370, § 11; T.C.A., §§ 4-533, 4-5-127; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 31; 1996, ch. 779, § 3; 2009, ch. 566, § 16.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 566, § 25 provided that the act shall apply to all rules and regulations filed with the secretary of state after July 1, 2009.

Law Reviews.

Judicial Notice in Tennessee (Robert Banks, Jr. and Elizabeth T. Collins), 21 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1991).